Texas, session 891, HB79.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 24.005, Property Code, is amended by amending Subsections (a) and (b) and adding Subsection (b-1) to read as follows: (a)  Except as otherwise provided by Subsection (b-1), if [If] the occupant is a tenant under a written lease or oral rental agreement, the landlord must give a tenant who defaults or holds over beyond the end of the rental term or renewal period at least 14 [three] days' written notice to vacate the premises before the landlord files a forcible detainer suit, unless the parties have contracted for a shorter or longer notice period in a written lease or agreement. A landlord who files a forcible detainer suit on grounds that the tenant is holding over beyond the end of the rental term or renewal period must also comply with the tenancy termination requirements of Section 91.001. (b)  Except as otherwise provided by Subsection (b-1), if [If] the occupant is a tenant at will or by sufferance, the landlord must give the tenant at least 14 [three] days' written notice to vacate before the landlord files a forcible detainer suit unless the parties have contracted for a shorter or longer notice period in a written lease or agreement. If a building is purchased at a tax foreclosure sale or a trustee's foreclosure sale under a lien superior to the tenant's lease and the tenant timely pays rent and is not otherwise in default under the tenant's lease after foreclosure, the purchaser must give a residential tenant of the building at least 30 days' written notice to vacate if the purchaser chooses not to continue the lease. The tenant is considered to timely pay the rent under this subsection if, during the month of the foreclosure sale, the tenant pays the rent for that month to the landlord before receiving any notice that a foreclosure sale is scheduled during the month or pays the rent for that month to the foreclosing lienholder or the purchaser at foreclosure not later than the fifth day after the date of receipt of a written notice of the name and address of the purchaser that requests payment. Before a foreclosure sale, a foreclosing lienholder may give written notice to a tenant stating that a foreclosure notice has been given to the landlord or owner of the property and specifying the date of the foreclosure. (b-1)  Notwithstanding Subsections (a) and (b), if the landlord terminates the lease as provided by Section 91.003, the landlord may file a forcible detainer suit on or after the third day after the date the landlord gives notice to a tenant under a written lease or oral rental agreement or at will or by sufferance. SECTION 2.  The changes in law made by this Act apply only to an eviction suit in which the notice to vacate is given on or after the effective date of this Act. An eviction suit in which the notice to vacate is given before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law as it existed immediately before the effective date of this Act, and that law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.